Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9605
Manufacturer of investigational drug, biological product, or device; powers.

A manufacturer of an investigational drug, biological product, or device may make the treatment available pursuant to the Investigational Drug Use Act. An eligible patient may request the manufacturer's investigational drug, biological product, or device for treatment pursuant to the act. The act does not require that a manufacturer make available an investigational drug, biological product, or device to an eligible patient.

Laws 2018, LB117, § 5.
July 19, 2018